Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.531, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. State total adult basic education aid. (a) The state total adult basic education aid for fiscal year deleted text begin 2024deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end equals deleted text begin $52,759,000deleted text end new text begin $65,170,000new text end , plus any amount that is not paid during the previous fiscal year as a result of adjustments under subdivision 4, paragraph (a), or section 124D.52, subdivision 3. The state total adult basic education aid for later fiscal years equals: (1) the state total adult basic education aid for the preceding fiscal year plus any amount that is not paid for during the previous fiscal year, as a result of adjustments under subdivision 4, paragraph (a), or section 124D.52, subdivision 3; times (2) the lesser of: (i) 1.03; or (ii) the greater of: (A) one plus the percent change in the formula allowance under section 126C.10, subdivision 2, from the previous fiscal year to the current fiscal year; or (B) the average growth in state total contact hours over the prior ten program years. Three percent of the state total adult basic education aid must be set aside for adult basic education supplemental service grants under section 124D.522. (b) The state total adult basic education aid, excluding basic population aid, equals the difference between the amount computed in paragraph (a), and the state total basic population aid under subdivision 2. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue in fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.531, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Adult basic education program aid limit. (a) Notwithstanding subdivisions 2 and 3, the total adult basic education aid for a program per prior year contact hour must not exceed deleted text begin $30deleted text end new text begin $36new text end per prior year contact hour computed under subdivision 3, clause (2). (b) The aid for a program under subdivision 3, clause (2), adjusted for changes in program membership, must not exceed the aid for that program under subdivision 3, clause (2), for the first preceding fiscal year by more than the greater of 11 percent or deleted text begin $10,000deleted text end new text begin $12,000new text end .new text begin The limit in this paragraph does not apply for aid in fiscal year 2026.new text end (c) Adult basic education aid is payable to a program for unreimbursed costs occurring in the program year as defined in section 124D.52, subdivision 3. (d) Any adult basic education aid that is not paid to a program because of the program aid limitation under paragraph (a) must be added to the state total adult basic education aid for the next fiscal year under subdivision 1. Any adult basic education aid that is not paid to a program because of the program aid limitations under paragraph (b) must be reallocated among programs by adjusting the rate per contact hour under subdivision 3, clause (2). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue in fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.55, is amended to read: 124D.55 COMMISSIONER-SELECTED HIGH SCHOOL EQUIVALENCY TEST FEES. deleted text begin (a) The commissioner shall pay 60 percent of the fee that is charged to an eligible individual for the full battery of the commissioner-selected high school equivalency tests, but not more than $40 for an eligible individual. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a),deleted text end For fiscal deleted text begin yearsdeleted text end new text begin yearnew text end 2023 deleted text begin through 2027 onlydeleted text end new text begin and laternew text end , subject to the availability of funds, the commissioner shall pay 100 percent of the fee charged to an eligible individual for the full battery of the commissioner-selected high school equivalency tests, but not more than the cost of one full battery of tests per year for any individual. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Adult basic education aid. new text end new text begin (a) For adult basic education aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.531: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The 2026 appropriation includes $....... for 2025 and $....... for 2026. new text end new text begin (c) The 2027 appropriation includes $....... for 2026 and $....... for 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin High school equivalency tests. new text end new text begin (a) For payment of the costs of the commissioner-selected high school equivalency tests under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.55: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 375,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 375,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) Any fiscal year 2026 balance remaining is available in fiscal year 2027. new text end